Washington statutes.
RCW 18.50.005

Definitions.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter:

(1) "*Advanced registered nurse practitioner" means an *advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW.

(2) "Department" means the department of health.

(3) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.

(4) "Midwife" means a midwife licensed under this chapter.

(5) "Naturopath" means a naturopath licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW.

(6) "Physician" means a physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW.

(7) "Physician assistant" means a physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW.

[2022 c 289 s 1; 1991 c 3 s 102; 1987 c 467 s 1; 1981 c 53 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The term "advanced registered nurse practitioner" was changed to "advanced practice registered nurse" by 2024 c 239 s 1, effective June 30, 2027.

Effective date—1981 c 53: "Sections 1, 2, 5, 6, 8, 9, 10, 11, and 13 through 17 of this act shall take effect January 15, 1982." [1981 c 53 s 19.]